test/src/morphology/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетненеккак
